Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB192.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 216B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Any county, charter county, urban-county government, consolidated local government,
or unified local government with a population of more than one hundred twenty
thousand (120,000) based on the most recent federal decennial census which is located
in a standard metropolitan statistical area with a population of more than two million
(2,000,000) based on the most recent federal decennial census and includes a state that
does not require a certificate of need for one (1) or more health services, may elect to
have every health service not requiring a certificate of need in the neighboring states
granted a nonsubstantive review pursuant to KRS 216B.095 and have the certificate of
need approved within thirty (30) days of receipt of submission for nonsubstantive
review.
Section 2. The following KRS section is repealed:
216B.010 Legislative findings and purposes.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/17/2025 5:14 PM Jacketed